District of Columbia statutes.
24-701

Purpose.

The purpose of §§ 24-701 to 24-711 is to protect the health and safety of the people of the District of Columbia from the menace of drug addiction and to afford an opportunity to the drug user for rehabilitation. The Congress intends that federal criminal laws shall be enforced against drug users as well as other persons, and §§ 24-701 to 24-711 shall not be used to substitute treatment for punishment in cases of crime committed by drug users.

June 24, 1953, 67 Stat. 77, ch. 149, § 2
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 609, ch. 676, title I, § 101
1973 Ed., § 24-601.
1981 Ed., § 24-601.
This section is referenced in § 11-921, § 24-702, § 24-704, § 24-707, § 24-709, § 24-710, § 24-711, and § 24-714.